Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.240

Final report. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Final report" means the report described as a final report in RCW 29B.25.090(11)(a).

[ 2024 c 164 s 224.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.